Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.767

Manufacturing cluster acceleration account.

(1) The manufacturing cluster acceleration account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from appropriations made to the manufacturing cluster acceleration account shall be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) The department may make expenditures from the account to support regional cluster acceleration strategies, including: Supporting projects to assist manufacturers to diversify their customer base and supply chain, supporting pilot or demonstration manufacturing projects coordination with organized cluster initiatives, and supporting projects that are intended to increase manufacturing and research and development jobs regionally.

(3) The department is encouraged to seek match funds for any funds appropriated to this account and may utilize funds to match nonstate funds being expended on a specific project that aligns with the purpose of this section.

[ 2022 c 157 s 1; 2021 c 64 s 5.]

NOTES:

Short title—2021 c 64: See note following RCW 43.330.760.